src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON u1
+N+Utr+Sg+Indef:a K ;
+N+Utr+Sg+Def:an K ;
+N+Utr+Pl+Indef:or K ;
+N+Utr+Pl+Def:orna K ;

LEXICON u2
+N+Utr+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Utr+Sg+Def:en K ;
+N+Utr+Pl+Indef:ar K ;
+N+Utr+Pl+Def:arna K ;



LEXICON u2
+N+Utr+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Utr+Sg+Def:en K ;
+N+Utr+Pl+Indef:er K ;
+N+Utr+Pl+Def:erna K ;


LEXICON n4
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def:t K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef:t K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:rna K ;


LEXICON n5
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def:et K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef: K ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:en K ;


LEXICON u5
+N+Utr+Sg+Indefe: K ;
+N+Utr+Sg+Def:en K ;
+N+Utr+Pl+Indef:e K ;
+N+Utr+Pl+Def:na K ;

LEXICON K
# ;
+Clt:s # ;
